Indiana, session 2026, HB1383.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 21-42-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 8. Military Health Care Training Transferability
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agency" means the Indiana
professional licensing agency established by IC 25-1-5-3.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "institution" means any:
(1) state educational institution; or
(2) nonprofit college or university.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "military health care personnel"
means an individual who has received formal training and
practical experience in health care disciplines during the
individual's military service, including providing:
(1) emergency medical care;
(2) preventive health care; and
(3) specialized medical services.
Sec. 4. (a) An institution may develop academic career pathways
2026 IN 1383—LS 7010/DI 143


and integrated academic bridge programs for military health care
personnel that are designed to enable current and former military
health care personnel to achieve credentialing outcomes in reduced
time.
(b) A program developed under subsection (a) must do the
following:
(1) Integrate military academic and experiential learning to
accelerate the transition from military to civilian health care
credentialing based on developed military to civilian
occupational crosswalks (as described by the United States
Department of Defense SkillBridge Program) for the
following military occupations or specialties:
(A) Infantryman.
(B) Hospital corpsman.
(C) Biomedical equipment specialist.
(D) Orthopedic specialist.
(E) Practical nursing specialist.
(F) Operating room specialist.
(G) Dental specialist.
(H) Physical therapy specialist.
(I) Patient administration specialist.
(J) Optical laboratory specialist.
(K) Medical logistics specialist.
(L) Medical laboratory specialist.
(M) Occupational therapy specialist.
(N) Nutrition care specialist.
(O) Cardiovascular specialist.
(P) Radiology specialist.
(Q) Pharmacy specialist.
(R) Veterinarian food inspection specialist.
(S) Preventive medicine specialist.
(T) Animal care specialist.
(U) Ear, nose, and throat specialist.
(V) Respiratory specialist.
(W) Combat medic specialist.
(X) Behavioral health specialist.
(Y) Eye specialist.
(Z) Independent duty medical technician.
(AA) Aerospace medical technician.
(2) Be fully compatible with the United States Department of
Defense SkillBridge Program.
Sec. 5. (a) An institution that participates in a program
2026 IN 1383—LS 7010/DI 143


described in section 4 of this chapter shall review military health
care personnel related health care programs in relationship to
realistic earning potential and employability of the institution's
graduates and submit a written report of the institution's findings
to the legislative council, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6,
not later than September 1 of each year.
(b) The report required under subsection (a) shall include the
following information:
(1) The minimum number of months or years required to
complete the health care program and the average number of
months or years military health care personnel graduates of
each health care program were enrolled.
(2) The graduation rate of each health care program and the
military health care personnel graduation rate.
(3) The employment rate of military health care personnel
graduates of each health care program within twelve (12)
months of graduation.
(4) A summary of all new actions taken by the institution
during the reporting year to increase military health care
personnel participation and to reduce transitional barriers to
health care professionals.
Sec. 6. An institution that participates in a program described
in section 4 of this chapter shall coordinate with the United States
Department of Labor and the Indiana department of veterans'
affairs established by IC 10-17-1-2 to use health care and military
recruiters, as well as other dedicated resources, to advocate,
facilitate, and promote the recruitment and enrollment of military
health care personnel into military health care academic and
career pathways.
Sec. 7. The agency shall collaborate with participating
institutions to integrate academic career pathways and academic
bridge programs for military health care personnel into the
agency's licensure requirements.
2026 IN 1383—LS 7010/DI 143